Washington statutes.
RCW 43.06.480

Timber harvest excise tax agreements—Quinault Nation.

(1) The governor is authorized to enter into a timber harvest excise tax agreement with the Quinault Nation. Agreements adopted under this section must provide that the tribal timber harvest excise tax rate be one hundred percent of the state timber harvest excise tax.

(2) A timber harvest excise tax agreement under this section is subject to RCW 43.06.475.

[ 2007 c 69 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2007 c 69: See note following RCW 43.06.475.